Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,197
Amusement ride; inspection; suspend permit; when.

The State Fire Marshal may inspect any amusement ride without notice at any time while such amusement ride is operating in this state. The State Fire Marshal may temporarily suspend a permit to operate an amusement ride if it has been determined after inspection to be hazardous or unsafe. An amusement ride shall not be operated while the permit for its operation is suspended. Operation of such an amusement ride shall not resume until the hazardous or unsafe condition is corrected to the satisfaction of the State Fire Marshal.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1807;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 33.